Wisconsin, session 2025, SB775.
do enact as follows:SB775,14Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 5insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table SB775,27Section 2. 20.115 (7) (ac) of the statutes is created to read:SB775,2,10820.115 (7) (ac) Sandhill crane damage reimbursements. As a continuing 9appropriation, the amounts in the schedule for the sandhill crane damage 10reimbursement program under s. 93.67.SB775,311Section 3. 93.67 of the statutes is created to read:SB775,2,131293.67 Sandhill crane damage reimbursement program. (1) In this 13section:SB775,2,1714(a) “Eligible applicant” means a person that plants corn on land that is 15operated as part of a farm that produced at least $6,000 in gross farm revenues 16during the taxable year preceding the year in which the person applies for 17reimbursement under this section.SB775,2,1918(b) “Farm” means all land under common ownership that is primarily devoted 19to agricultural use.SB775,2,2120(c) “Seed coating” means a nonlethal treatment registered for use on corn seed 21to discourage sandhill cranes from consuming the seed.SB775,2,2422(2) (a) The department shall administer a program to provide 23reimbursements to eligible applicants for the purchase of seed coating that is 24applied as a seed treatment.SB775,3,31(b) A reimbursement under this section shall cover not more than 50 percent 2of the actual cost of the purchase of seed coating that is applied as a seed treatment 3and may not exceed $6,250 per eligible applicant per planting season.SB775,3,84(c) From March 1 to June 15 of each year, eligible applicants may apply to the 5department for reimbursement for seed coating purchased no earlier than 6November 1 of the prior year. Eligible applicants shall provide to the department 7proof of purchase and an application on a form provided by the department to be 8eligible to receive a reimbursement under this section.SB775,3,109(d) From the appropriation under s. 20.115 (7) (ac), the department shall 10prioritize reimbursement payments under par. (c) to all of the following:SB775,3,12111. Eligible applicants that received a federal depredation permit for sandhill 12crane in the previous year.SB775,3,15132. Eligible applicants that received reimbursement under this section in any 14of the prior 3 years or that can provide documentation of purchase of seed coating in 15any of the prior 3 years.SB775,3,18163. Eligible applicants planting corn on land vulnerable to sandhill crane 17depredation as determined by the department in consultation with the department 18of natural resources and applicable conservation organizations.SB775,3,2419(e) After reimbursing all eligible applicants under par. (d), from the 20appropriation under s. 20.115 (7) (ac), the department shall make reimbursement 21payments to other eligible applicants that have experienced or are likely to 22experience seed or crop damage from sandhill cranes. The department shall make 23payments under this paragraph to eligible applicants in the order in which 24applications are received by the department.SB775,4,31(f) The department shall make all reimbursement payments under pars. (d) 2and (e) no later than September 15 of the year in which applications are made 3under par. (c).SB775,4,54(g) A farm is eligible to receive only one reimbursement payment per year 5under this section.SB775,4,116(3) The department shall compile an annual report detailing the number of 7reimbursements requested, the total dollar amount requested as reimbursement, 8the number of reimbursements issued, and the total dollar amount disbursed as 9reimbursement under this section. The department shall submit the report to the 10appropriate standing committees of the legislature in the manner provided in s. 1113.172 (3) no later than December 31 each year.SB775,4,1512(4) The department may promulgate rules to establish prioritization of 13payments under sub. (2) (d) and (e), including identifying applicable conservation 14organizations under sub. (2) (d) 3. and determining whether eligible applicants 15have experienced or are likely to experience seed or crop damage under sub. (2) (e).SB775,416Section 4. Fiscal changes.SB775,4,2317(1) In the schedule under s. 20.005 (3) for the appropriation to the department 18of agriculture, trade and consumer protection under s. 20.115 (7) (a), the dollar 19amount for fiscal year 2025-26 is increased by $85,000 and the dollar amount for 20fiscal year 2026-27 is increased by $85,000 to increase the authorized FTE positions 21for the department by 1.0 GPR position to administer the sandhill crane damage 22reimbursement program under s. 93.67 and for administrative costs related to the 23program.SB775,524Section 5. Effective date.SB775,5,21(1) This act takes effect on the first day of the 4th month beginning after 2publication.SB775,5,33